California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(2) Subject to the personal and subject matter jurisdiction and disciplinary authority of the board and the courts of this state
 to the same extent as a holder of a valid practice privilege.

(3) Deemed to have appointed the regulatory agency of the state in which the principal place of business identified by the individual is located, as the individual’s agent on whom notices, subpoenas, or other process may be served in any action or proceeding by the board against the individual.

(b) The board may revoke a practice privilege from any individual who has violated this section or implementing regulations or committed any act which would be grounds for discipline against the holder of a practice privilege.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 293, Sec. 20.   (AB 1175)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.2.

(a) (1) Practice privileges may be revoked for any of the following reasons:

(A) If an individual no longer qualifies under, or complies with, the provisions of this article, including, but not limited to, Section 5096, or implementing regulations.

(B) If an individual commits any act that if committed by an applicant for licensure would be grounds for denial of a license under Section 480.

(C) If an individual commits any act that if committed by a licensee would be grounds for discipline under Section 5100.

(D) If an individual commits any act
 outside of this state that would be a violation if committed within this state.

(E) If an individual acquires at any time, while exercising the practice privilege, any disqualifying condition under paragraph (2).

(2) Disqualifying conditions include:

(A) Conviction of any crime other than a minor traffic violation.

(B) Revocation, suspension, denial, surrender, or other discipline or sanctions involving any license, permit, registration, certificate, or other authority to practice any profession in this or any other state or foreign country or to practice before any state, federal, or local court or agency, or the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board.

(C) Any judgment or arbitration
 award against the individual involving the professional conduct of the individual in the amount of thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) or greater.

(D) Any other conditions as specified by the board in regulation.

(3) The board may adopt regulations exempting specified minor occurrences of the conditions listed in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) from being disqualifying conditions under this subdivision.

(b) The board may revoke practice privileges using either of the following procedures:

(1) Notifying the individual in writing of all of the following:

(A) That the practice privilege is revoked.

(B) The reasons for
 revocation.

(C) The earliest date on which the individual may qualify for a practice privilege.

(D) That the individual has a right to appeal the notice and request a hearing under the provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) if a written notice of appeal and request for hearing is made within 60 days.

(E) That, if the individual does not submit a notice of appeal and request for hearing within 60 days, the board’s action set forth in the notice shall become final.

(2) Filing a statement of issues under the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(c) An individual whose practice privilege has been revoked may only subsequently exercise the practice privilege upon application to the board for reinstatement of the practice privilege not less than one year after the effective date of the notice or decision revoking the practice privilege, unless a longer time period is specified in the notice or decision revoking the practice privilege.

(d) Holders of practice privileges are subject to suspension, citations, fines, or other disciplinary actions for any conduct that would be grounds for discipline against a licensee of the board or for any conduct in violation of this article or regulations adopted thereunder.

(e) The board may recover its costs pursuant to Section 5107 as part of any disciplinary proceeding against the holder of a practice privilege.

(f) The provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), including, but not limited to, the commencement of a disciplinary proceeding by the filing of an accusation by the board, shall apply under this article.

(g) If the board revokes or otherwise limits an individual’s practice privilege, the board shall promptly notify the regulatory agency of the state or states in which the individual is licensed, and the United States Securities and Exchange Commission, the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board, and the National Association of State Boards of Accountancy.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 319, Sec. 4) by Stats. 2018, Ch. 447, Sec. 7.   (SB 795)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.4.

(a) The right of an individual to practice in this state under a practice privilege may be administratively suspended at any time by an order issued by the board or its executive officer, without prior notice or hearing, for the purpose of conducting a disciplinary investigation, proceeding, or inquiry concerning the individual’s competence or qualifications to practice under practice privileges, failure to timely respond to a board inquiry or request for information or documents, or under other conditions and circumstances provided for by board regulation.

(b) The administrative suspension order is immediately effective when mailed to the individual’s address of record or agent for notice and service as provided for in this article.

(c) The administrative suspension order shall contain the following:

(1) The reason for the suspension.

(2) A statement that the individual has the right, within 30 days, to appeal the administrative suspension order and request a hearing.

(3) A statement that any appeal hearing will be conducted under the provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) applicable to individuals who are denied licensure, including the filing of a statement of issues by the board setting forth the reasons for the administrative suspension of practice privileges and specifying the statutes and rules with which the individual must show compliance by producing proof at the
 hearing and in addition any particular matters that have come to the attention of the board and that would authorize the administrative suspension, or the revocation of practice privileges.

(d) The burden is on the holder of the suspended practice privilege to establish both qualification and fitness to practice under practice privileges.

(e) The administrative suspension shall continue in effect until terminated by an order of the board or the executive officer.

(f) Administrative suspension is not discipline and shall not preclude any individual from applying for a license to practice public accountancy in this state.

(g) Proceedings to appeal an administrative suspension order may be combined or coordinated with proceedings for revocation or
 discipline of a practice privilege.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 293, Sec. 21.   (AB 1175)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.5.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, an individual may not sign any attest report pursuant to a practice privilege unless the individual meets the experience requirements of Section 5095.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 411, Sec. 23) by Stats. 2018, Ch. 447, Sec. 12.   (SB 795)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.6.

In addition to the authority otherwise provided for by this code, the board may delegate to the executive officer the authority to issue any notice or order provided for in this article and to act on behalf of the board, including, but not limited to, issuing an interim suspension order, subject to the right of the individual to timely appeal and request a hearing as provided for in this article.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 411, Sec. 26) by Stats. 2018, Ch. 447, Sec. 14.   (SB 795)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.7.

(a) Anywhere the term “license,” “licensee,” “permit,” or “certificate” is used in this chapter or Division 1.5 (commencing with Section 475), it shall include persons holding practice privileges under this article, unless otherwise inconsistent with the provisions of the article.

(b) Anywhere the term “employee” is used in this article it shall include, but is not limited to, partners, shareholders, and other owners.

(c) For purposes of this article, the term “license” includes certificate or permit.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 411, Sec. 29) by Stats. 2018, Ch. 447, Sec. 16.   (SB 795)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.8.

In addition to the authority otherwise provided by this code, all investigative powers of the board, including those delegated to the executive officer, shall apply to investigations concerning compliance with, or actual or potential violations of, the provisions of this article or implementing regulations, including, but not limited to, the power to conduct investigations and hearings by the executive officer under
 Section 5103 and to issuance of subpoenas under Section 5108.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 921, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.9.

(a) The board is authorized to adopt regulations to implement, interpret, or make specific the provisions of this article.

(b) The board may adopt emergency regulations in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) to establish policies, guidelines, and procedures to initially implement this article as it goes into effect on July 1, 2013. The adoption of the regulations shall be considered by the Office of Administrative Law to be necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, or general welfare. The emergency regulations shall be submitted to the Office of Administrative Law for filing with the Secretary of State in
 accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

(c) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, to ensure uninterrupted implementation of this article, the board may adopt or amend regulations consistent with Section 100 of Title 1 of the California Code of Regulations to remove or extend the inoperative date of its regulations in Article 3 (commencing with Section 18) of Division 1 of Title 16 of the California Code of Regulations, or to remove the inoperative dates for the regulations in Article 4 (commencing with Section 26) of Division 1 of Title 16 of the California Code of Regulations.

(2) Notwithstanding any other law, the Office of Administrative Law shall consider the board’s action to remove or extend the inoperative dates of these regulations as a change without
 regulatory effect as described in Section 100 of Title 1 of the California Code of Regulations that exempts the board from complying with the rulemaking procedure specified in the Administrative Procedure Act (Article 5 (commencing with Section 11346) of Chapter 3.5 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 447, Sec. 18.   (SB 795)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.12.

(a) A certified public accounting firm that is authorized to practice in another state and that does not have an office in this state may engage in the practice of public accountancy in this state through the holder of a practice privilege provided that:

(1) The practice of public accountancy by the firm is limited to authorized practice by the holder of the practice privilege.

(2) A firm that engages in practice under this section is deemed to consent to the personal, subject matter, and disciplinary jurisdiction of the board with respect to any practice under this section.

(b) The board may revoke, suspend, issue a fine pursuant to
 Article 6.5 (commencing with Section 5116), issue a citation and fine pursuant to Section 125.9, or otherwise restrict or discipline the firm for any act that would be grounds for discipline against a holder of a practice privilege through which the firm practices.

(c) A firm that provides the services described in subdivision (c) of Section 5096 shall obtain a registration from the board. At the time of registration, if the firm has a valid email address, it shall provide that email address to the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 293, Sec. 22.   (AB 1175)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.20.

(a) To ensure that Californians are protected from out-of-state licensees with disqualifying conditions, the board shall maintain an out-of-state licensee feature on its license lookup tab of the home page of its internet website that allows consumers to obtain information about an individual whose principal place of business is not in this state and who seeks to exercise a practice privilege in this state. At minimum, these features shall include all of the following:

(1) The ability of the consumer to search by name and state of licensure.

(2) The disclosure of information in the possession of the board, which the board is otherwise authorized to publicly disclose, about an individual exercising a
 practice privilege in this state, including, but not limited to, whether the board has taken action of any form against that individual and, if so, what the action was or is.

(3) A disclaimer that the consumer must click through prior to being referred to any other internet website, which in plain language explains that the consumer is being referred to an internet website that is maintained by a regulatory agency or other entity that is not affiliated with the board. This disclaimer shall include a link to relevant sections of this article that set forth disqualifying conditions, including, but not limited to, Section 5096.2.

(4) A statement in plain language that notifies consumers that they are permitted to file complaints against such individuals with the board.

(5) A link to the internet website or sites that
 the board determines, in its discretion, provides the consumer the most complete and reliable information available about the individual’s status as a licenseholder, permitholder, or certificate holder.

(6) If the board of another state does not maintain an internet website that allows a consumer to obtain information about its licensees including, but not limited to, disciplinary history, and that information is not available through a link to an internet website maintained by another entity, a link to contact information for that board, which contains a disclaimer in plain language that explains that the consumer is being referred to a board that does not permit the consumer to obtain information, including, but not limited to, disciplinary history, about individuals through the internet website, and that the out-of-state board is not affiliated with the board.

(b) The board
 shall biennially survey the internet websites and disclosure policies of other boards to ensure that its disclaimers are accurate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 293, Sec. 23.   (AB 1175)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.21.

(a) (1) If the board determines, through a majority vote of the board at a regularly scheduled meeting, that allowing individuals from a particular state to practice in this state pursuant to a practice privilege as described in Section 5096, violates the board’s duty to protect the public, pursuant to Section 5000.1, the board shall require out-of-state individuals licensed from that state, as a condition to exercising a practice privilege in this state, to file the notification form and pay the applicable fees as required by Section 5096.22.

(2) A state for which the board has made a determination pursuant to paragraph (1) to require individuals licensed from that state to file a notification form and pay the applicable fees may
 subsequently be redetermined by the board, by majority vote of the board at a regularly scheduled meeting, to allow individuals from that state to practice in this state pursuant to a practice privilege as described in Section 5096.

(b) The board shall, at minimum, consider the following factors when making a determination or redetermination pursuant to subdivision (a):

(1) Whether the state timely and adequately addresses enforcement referrals made by the board to the accountancy regulatory board of that state, or otherwise fails to respond to requests the board deems necessary to meet its obligations under this article.

(2) Whether the state makes the disciplinary history of its licensees publicly available through the internet in a manner that allows the board to adequately link consumers to an internet website to
 obtain information.

(3) Whether the state imposes discipline against licensees that is appropriate in light of the nature of the alleged misconduct.

(4) Whether the state has in place and is operating pursuant to enforcement practices substantially equivalent to the current best practices guidelines adopted by the National Association of State Boards of Accountancy provided those guidelines have been determined by the board to meet or exceed the board’s own enforcement practices.

(5) Whether the state has in place and implements comparable licensure requirements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 293, Sec. 24.   (AB 1175)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.22.

(a) An individual whose principal place of business is in a state subject to an action of the board pursuant to Section 5096.21 shall do all of the following:

(1) Prior to practicing, submit a notification form to the board in a manner prescribed by board regulation.

(2) If the board has determined the state in which the individual has their principal place of business to not have comparable licensure requirements, indicate on the notification form they satisfy one of the following:

(A) Have continually practiced public accountancy as a certified public accountant under a current and active license issued by any state for at least 4 of
 the last 10 years.

(B) Have passed the Uniform Certified Public Accountant Examination and completed education that included a baccalaureate degree or higher with an accounting concentration and at least one year of general accounting experience. 

(3) Pay a fee equal to the reasonable administrative costs, as established by the board.

(b) Except as otherwise provided by this article or by board regulation, a practice privilege subject to this section shall commence when the individual submits a properly completed notification form to the board, provided that the fee is received by the board within 30 days of that date. The board shall permit the notification to be provided electronically.

(c) An individual shall not be deemed to be in violation of this
 section solely because they begin the practice of public accounting in California prior to notifying the board as indicated in subdivision (a), provided the notice is given within five business days of the date practice begins. An individual who properly notifies the board within the five-day period provided for in this subdivision shall be deemed to have a practice privilege from the first day of practice in California unless the individual fails to timely submit the required fee. Failure to comply with this section means that the individual is practicing public accountancy unlawfully in this state and is in violation of Section 5120. In addition to any other available remedy, the board may issue a fine equal to reasonable enforcement costs if an individual notifies the board more than five business days after beginning practice in California.

(d) An individual whose principal place of business is in a state subject to an action by the board
 pursuant to Section 5096.21 shall not be deemed in violation of the notice and fee requirements of this section if the failure to comply occurs within 60 days of the date of the board action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 293, Sec. 25.   (AB 1175)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5.5. Audit Documentation [5097. - 5098.]

5097.

(a) Audit documentation shall be a licensee’s records of the procedures applied, the tests performed, the information obtained, and the pertinent conclusions reached in an audit engagement. Audit documentation shall include, but is not limited to, programs, analyses, memoranda, letters of confirmation and representation, copies or abstracts of company documents, and schedules or commentaries prepared or obtained by the licensee.

(b) Audit documentation shall contain sufficient documentation to enable a reviewer with relevant knowledge and experience, having no previous connection with the audit engagement, to understand the nature, timing, extent, and results of the auditing or other procedures performed, evidence obtained, and conclusions reached, and to determine the identity of the persons who performed and reviewed the work.

(c) Failure of the audit documentation to document the procedures applied, tests performed, evidence obtained, and relevant conclusions reached in an engagement shall raise a presumption that the procedures were not applied, tests were not performed, information was not obtained, and relevant conclusions were not reached. This presumption shall be a rebuttable presumption affecting the burden of proof relative to those portions of the audit that are not documented as required in subdivision (b). The burden may be met by a preponderance of the evidence.

(d) Audit documentation shall be maintained by a licensee for the longer of the following:

(1) The minimum period of retention provided in subdivision (e).

(2) A period sufficient to satisfy professional standards and to comply with applicable laws and regulations.

(e) Audit documentation shall be maintained for a minimum of seven years which shall be extended during the pendency of any board investigation, disciplinary action, or legal action involving the licensee or the licensee’s firm. The board may adopt regulations to establish a different retention period for specific categories of audit documentation where the board finds that the nature of the documentation warrants it.

(f) Licensees shall maintain a written documentation retention and destruction policy that shall set forth the licensee’s practices and procedures complying with this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 230, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

5098.

The board may adopt regulations to implement, interpret, and make specific provisions relating to the following:

(a) Requirements for licensees maintaining an audit documentation retention policy and procedures for review and approval of audit documentation destruction.

(b) Procedures for the identification, dating, and retention of audit documentation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 230, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Disciplinary Proceedings [5100. - 5115.]

5100.

After notice and hearing the board may revoke, suspend, or refuse to renew any permit or certificate granted under Article 4 (commencing with Section 5070) and Article 5 (commencing with Section 5080), or may censure the holder of that permit or certificate for unprofessional conduct that includes, but is not limited to, one or any combination of the following causes:

(a) Conviction of any crime substantially related to the qualifications, functions and duties of a certified public accountant or a public accountant.

(b) A violation of Section 478, 498, or 499 dealing with false statements or omissions in the application for a license, in obtaining a certificate as a certified public accountant, in obtaining registration under this chapter, or in obtaining a permit to practice public accountancy under this chapter.

(c) Dishonesty, fraud, gross negligence, or repeated negligent acts committed in the same or different engagements, for the same or different clients, or any combination of engagements or clients, each resulting in a violation of applicable professional standards that indicate a lack of competency in the practice of public accountancy or in the performance of the bookkeeping operations described in Section 5052.

(d) Cancellation, revocation, or suspension of a certificate or other authority to practice as a certified public accountant or a public accountant, refusal to renew the certificate or other authority to practice as a certified public accountant or a public accountant, or any other discipline by any other state or foreign country.

(e) Violation of Section 5097.

(f) Violation of Section 5120.

(g) Willful violation of this chapter or any rule or regulation promulgated by the board under the authority granted under this chapter.

(h) Suspension or revocation of the right to practice before any governmental body or agency.

(i) Fiscal dishonesty or breach of fiduciary responsibility of any kind.

(j) Knowing preparation, publication, or dissemination of false, fraudulent, or materially misleading financial statements, reports, or information.

(k) Embezzlement, theft, misappropriation of funds or property, or obtaining money, property, or other valuable consideration by fraudulent means or false pretenses.

(l) The imposition of any discipline, penalty, or sanction on a registered public accounting firm or any associated person of such firm, or both, or on any other holder of a permit, certificate, license, or other authority to practice in this state, by the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board or the United States Securities and Exchange Commission, or their designees under the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002 or other federal legislation.

(m) Unlawfully engaging in the practice of public accountancy in another state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 921, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

5100.1.

Notwithstanding any other law, in causes for discipline against a licensee under subdivisions (d), (h), or (l) of Section 5100, the board shall rely on the findings or events stated in a certified or true and correct copy of the disciplinary or other action as conclusive evidence for the purpose of determining discipline.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 359, Sec. 13.   (AB 1521)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

5100.2.

(a) In addition to the grounds for the denial of a license pursuant to Section 480, the board may deny an applicant for a license if either of the following conditions are met:

(1) The applicant was convicted of a financial crime currently classified as a felony that is directly and adversely related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of a certified public accountant, pursuant to regulations adopted by the board. The seven-year limitation as described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 480 shall not apply.

(2) The applicant, within the preceding seven years from the date of application, was subjected to a disciplinary action taken by an agency of the federal
 government, the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board, or another country for any act substantially related to the functions, qualifications, or duties of a certified public accountant.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, in causes for denial of an application for licensure pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of this section, the board shall rely on the findings or events stated in a certified or true and correct copy of the disciplinary or other action as conclusive evidence for purposes of determining whether to deny the application.

(c) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2020.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 359, Sec. 14.   (AB 1521)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Section operative July 1, 2020, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

5100.5.

(a) After notice and hearing the board may, for unprofessional conduct, permanently restrict or limit the practice of a licensee or impose a probationary term or condition on a license, which prohibits the licensee from performing or engaging in any of the acts or services described in Section 5051.

(b) A licensee may petition the board pursuant to Section 5115 for reduction of penalty or reinstatement of the privilege to engage in the service or act restricted or limited by the board.

(c) The authority or sanctions provided by this section are in addition to any other civil, criminal, or administrative penalties or sanctions provided by
 law, and do not supplant, but are cumulative to, other disciplinary authority, penalties, or sanctions.

(d) Failure to comply with any restriction or limitation imposed by the board pursuant to this section is grounds for revocation of the license.

(e) For purposes of this section, both of the following shall apply:

(1) “Unprofessional conduct” includes, but is not limited to, those grounds for discipline or denial listed in Section 5100.

(2) “Permanently restrict or limit the practice of” includes, but is not limited to, the prohibition on engaging in or performing any attestation engagement, audits, or compilations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 656, Sec. 5.   (SB 467)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

5101.

After notice and hearing the board shall revoke the registration and permit to practice of a partnership if at any time it does not have all the qualifications prescribed by the section of this chapter under which it qualified for registration. After notice and hearing the board may revoke, suspend or refuse to renew the permit to practice of a partnership or may censure the holder of such permit for any of the causes enumerated in Section 5100 and for the following additional causes:

(a) The revocation or suspension of the certificate or registration or the revocation or suspension of or refusal to renew the permit to practice of any partner.

(b) The cancellation, revocation or suspension of certificate or other authority to practice or refusal to renew the certificate or other authority of the partnership of any partner thereof to practice public accountancy in any other state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1947, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

5102.

The proceedings under this article shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing at Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the board shall have all the powers granted therein.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 310.)
-------------------------------------------

5103.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the board may inquire into any alleged violation of this chapter or any other state or federal law, regulation, or rule relevant to the practice of accountancy.

(b) The board, or its executive officer pursuant to a delegation of authority from the board, is authorized to perform the following functions:

(1) To receive and investigate complaints and to conduct investigations or hearings, with or without the filing of any complaint, and to obtain information and evidence relating to any matter involving the conduct of licensees, as directed by the board, or as directed by the executive officer pursuant to a delegation of authority from the board.

(2) To receive and investigate complaints and to conduct investigations or hearings, with or without the filing of any complaint, and to obtain information and evidence relating to any matter involving any violation or alleged violation of this chapter by licensees, as directed by the board, or as directed by the executive officer pursuant to a delegation of authority from the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 231, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

5103.5.

(a) The board shall post on its internet website, in an easily marked and identifiable location, notice of all formal accusations. The notice of any formal accusation shall contain a link to where a person may request and have sent to them a copy of the formal accusation, and the basis for the accusation and alleged violations filed by the board against a licensee.

(b) The link to where a person may request and have sent to them a copy of the formal accusation shall be clearly and conspicuously located on the same internet website page on which the notice is posted and shall authorize a person to request and receive the information described in subdivision (a) by regular mail or electronic mail.

(c) The board shall develop a statement that informs any person requesting a copy of a formal accusation and any person receiving a copy of a formal accusation that any allegations contained in the accusation are not a final determination of wrongdoing and are subject to adjudication and final review by the board pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code). This statement shall be provided to a person requesting and receiving a copy of a formal accusation in a manner to be determined by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 510, Sec. 82.   (SB 887)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

5104.

Any certified public accountant or public accountant whose certificate, registration, or permit has been revoked or suspended shall, upon request of the board, relinquish their certificate or permit. However, upon the expiration of the period of suspension, the board shall immediately return any suspended certificate or permit that has been relinquished.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 510, Sec. 83.   (SB 887)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

5105.

Any certified public accountant or public accountant who is delinquent in the payment of his renewal fee shall upon request of the board relinquish his certificate and permit; provided, however, the board shall reissue any certificate and permit which has been relinquished for nonpayment of renewal fees if the permit is renewed as provided in Section 5070.6.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1254.)
-------------------------------------------

5106.

A plea or verdict of guilty or a conviction following a plea of nolo contendere is deemed to be a conviction within the meaning of this article. The record of the conviction shall be conclusive evidence thereof. The board may order the certificate or permit suspended or revoked, or may decline to issue a certificate or permit, when the time for appeal has elapsed, or the judgment of conviction has been affirmed on appeal or when an order granting probation is made, suspending the imposition of sentence, irrespective of a subsequent order under the provisions of Section 1203.4 of the Penal Code allowing such person to withdraw his plea of guilty and to enter a plea of not guilty, or setting aside the verdict of guilty or dismissing the accusation, information or indictment.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 5107 by Stats. 1959, Ch. 310.)
-------------------------------------------

5107.

(a) The executive officer of the board may request the administrative law judge, as part of the proposed decision in a disciplinary proceeding, to direct any holder of a permit or certificate found to have committed a violation or violations of this chapter to pay to the board all reasonable costs of investigation and prosecution of the case, including, but not limited to, attorney’s fees. The board shall not recover costs incurred at the administrative hearing.

(b) A certified copy of the actual costs, or a good faith estimate of costs where actual costs are not available, signed by the executive officer, shall be prima facie evidence of reasonable costs of investigation and prosecution of the case.

(c) The administrative law judge shall make a proposed finding of the amount of reasonable costs of investigation and prosecution of the case when requested to do so by the executive officer pursuant to subdivision (a). Costs are payable 120 days after the board’s decision is final, unless otherwise provided for by the administrative law judge or if the time for payment is extended by the board.

(d) The finding of the administrative law judge with regard to cost shall not be reviewable by the board to increase the cost award. The board may reduce or eliminate the cost award, or remand to the administrative law judge where the proposed decision fails to make a finding on costs requested by the executive officer pursuant to subdivision (a).

(e) The administrative law judge may make a further finding that the amount of reasonable costs awarded shall be reduced or
 eliminated upon a finding that respondent has demonstrated that they cannot pay all or a portion of the costs or that payment of the costs would cause an unreasonable financial hardship that cannot be remedied through a payment plan.

(f) When an administrative law judge makes a finding that costs be waived or reduced, they shall set forth the factual basis for their finding in the proposed decision.

(g) Where an order for recovery of costs is made and timely payment is not made as directed by the board’s decision, the board may enforce the order for payment in any appropriate court. This right of enforcement shall be in addition to any other rights the board may have as to any holder of a permit or certificate directed to pay costs.

(h) In a judicial action for the recovery of costs, proof of the board’s decision
 shall be conclusive proof of the validity of the order of payment and the terms of payment.

(i) All costs recovered under this section shall be deposited in the Accountancy Fund.

(j) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), the board shall not renew or reinstate the permit or certificate of a holder who has failed to pay all of the costs ordered under this section.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1) or paragraph (2) of subdivision (g) of Section 125.3, the board may, in its discretion, conditionally renew or reinstate for a maximum of three years the permit or certificate of a holder who demonstrates financial hardship and who enters into a formal agreement with the board to reimburse the board within that three-year period for those unpaid costs.

(k) Nothing in this section shall preclude the board from seeking recovery of costs in an order or decision made pursuant to an agreement entered into between the board and the holder of a permit or certificate.

(l) (1) Costs may not be recovered under this section as a result of a citation issued pursuant to Section 125.9 and its implementing language if the licensee complies with the citation.

(2) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that this subdivision is declaratory of existing law.
